lib/vendor/Text_TeXHyphen/hyph_bg_BG.dic
ערד8
ערה8
ערז8
ערח8
ערי8
ערך8
ערכ8
ערל8
ערם8
ערן8
ערנ8
ערס8
ערע8
ערפ8
ערץ8
ערצ8
ערק8
ערר8
ערש8
עשב8
עשג8
עשד8
עשה8
עשז8
עשח8
עשי8
עשך8
עשכ8
עשל8
עשם8
עשן8
עשנ8
עשס8
עשע8
עשפ8
עשץ8
עשצ8
עשק8
עשר8
עשש8
ף1
ף2ב
ף2ג
ף2ד
ף2ה
ף2ז
ף2ח
ף2י
ף2ך
ף2כ
ף2ל
ף2ם
ף2ן
ף2נ
ף2ס
ף2ע
ף2פ
ף2ץ
ף2צ
ף2ק
ף2ר
ף2ש
ף3בא
ף3בו
ף3בט
ף3במ
ף3בף
ף3בת
ף3בü
ף3ב‏
ף3בÿ
ף3גא
ף3גו
ף3גט
ף3גמ
ף3גף
ף3גת
ף3גü
ף3ג‏
ף3גÿ
ף3דא
ף3דו
ף3דט
ף3דמ
ף3דף
ף3דת
ף3דü
ף3ד‏
ף3דÿ
ף3הא
ף3הו
ף3הזא
ף3הזו
ף3הזט
ף3הזמ
ף3הזף
ף3הזת
ף3הזü
ף3הז‏
ף3הזÿ
ף3החא
ף3החו
ף3החט
ף3החמ
ף3החף
ף3החת
ף3החü
ף3הח‏
ף3החÿ
ף3הט
ף3המ
ף3הף
ף3הת
ף3הü
ף3ה‏
ף3הÿ
ף3זא
ף3זו
ף3זט
ף3זמ
ף3זף
ף3זת
ף3זü
ף3ז‏
ף3זÿ
ף3חא
ף3חו
ף3חט
ף3חמ
ף3חף
ף3חת
ף3חü
ף3ח‏
ף3חÿ
ף3יא
ף3יו
ף3יט
ף3ימ
ף3יף
ף3ית
ף3יü
ף3י‏
ף3יÿ
ף3ךא
ף3ךו
ף3ךט
ף3ךמ
ף3ךף
ף3ךת
ף3ךü
ף3ך‏
ף3ךÿ
ף3כא
ף3כו
ף3כט
ף3כמ
ף3כף
ף3כת
ף3כü
ף3כ‏
ף3כÿ
ף3לא
ף3לו
ף3לט
ף3למ
ף3לף
ף3לת
ף3לü
ף3ל‏
ף3לÿ
ף3םא
ף3םו
ף3םט
ף3םמ
ף3םף
ף3םת
ף3םü
ף3ם‏
ף3םÿ
ף3ןא
ף3ןו
ף3ןט
ף3ןמ
ף3ןף
ף3ןת
ף3ןü
ף3ן‏
ף3ןÿ
ף3נא
ף3נו
ף3נט
ף3נמ
ף3נף
ף3נת
ף3נü
ף3נ‏
ף3נÿ
ף3סא
ף3סו
ף3סט
ף3סמ
ף3סף
ף3סת
ף3סü
ף3ס‏
ף3סÿ
ף3עא
ף3עו
ף3עט
ף3עמ
ף3עף
ף3עת
ף3עü
ף3ע‏
ף3עÿ
ף3פא
ף3פו
ף3פט
ף3פמ
ף3פף
ף3פת
ף3פü
ף3פ‏
ף3פÿ
ף3ץא
ף3ץו
ף3ץט
ף3ץמ
ף3ץף
ף3ץת
ף3ץü
ף3ץ‏
ף3ץÿ
ף3צא
ף3צו
ף3צט
ף3צמ
ף3צף
ף3צת
ף3צü
ף3צ‏
ף3צÿ
ף3קא
ף3קו
ף3קט
ף3קמ
ף3קף
ף3קת
ף3קü
ף3ק‏
ף3קÿ
ף3רא
ף3רו
ף3רט
ף3רמ
ף3רף
ף3רת
ף3רü
ף3ר‏
ף3רÿ
ף3שא
ף3שו
ף3שט
ף3שמ
ף3שף
ף3שת
ף3שü
ף3ש‏
ף3שÿ
ףאא4
ףאו4
ףאט4
ףאמ4
ףאף4
ףאת4
ףא‏4
ףאÿ4
ףוא4
ףוו4
ףוט4
ףומ4
ףוף4
ףות4
ףו‏4
ףוÿ4
ףטא4
ףטו4
ףטט4
ףטמ4
ףטף4
ףטת4
ףט‏4
ףטÿ4
ףמא4
ףמו4
ףמט4
ףממ4
ףמף4
ףמת4
ףמ‏4
ףמÿ4
ףףא4
ףףו4
ףףט4
ףףמ4
ףףף4
ףףת4
ףף‏4
ףףÿ4
ףתא4
ףתו4
ףתט4
ףתמ4
ףתף4
ףתת4
ףת‏4
ףתÿ4
ף‏א4
ף‏ו4
ף‏ט4
ף‏מ4
ף‏ף4
ף‏ת4
ף‏‏4
ף‏ÿ4
ףÿא4
ףÿו4
ףÿט4
ףÿמ4
ףÿף4
ףÿת4
ףÿ‏4
ףÿÿ4
פ1
פ2א
פ2ו
פ2ט
פ2מ
פ2ף
פ2ת
פ2‏
פ2ÿ
פי4
פכ4
פל4
פם4
פנ4
ץ1
ץ2א
ץ2ו
ץ2ט
ץ2מ
ץ2ף
ץ2ת
ץ2‏
ץ2ÿ
ץי4
ץכ4
ץל4
ץם4
ץנ4
צ1
צ2א
צ2ו
צ2ט
צ2מ
צ2ף
צ2ת
צ2‏
צ2ÿ
צי4
צכ4
צל4
צם4
צנ4
ק1
ק2א
ק2ו
ק2ט
ק2מ
ק2ף
ק2ת
ק2‏
ק2ÿ
קי4
קכ4
קל4
קם4
קנ4
ר1
ר2א
ר2ו
ר2ט
ר2מ
ר2ף
ר2ת
ר2‏
ר2ÿ
רי4
רכ4
רל4
רם4
רנ4
ש1
ש2א
ש2ו
ש2ט
ש2מ
ש2ף
ש2ת
ש2‏
ש2ÿ
שי4
שכ4
של4
שם4
שנ4
ת1
ת2ב
ת2ג
ת2ד
ת2ה
ת2ז
ת2ח
ת2י
ת2ך
ת2כ
ת2ל
ת2ם
ת2ן
ת2נ
ת2ס
ת2ע
ת2פ
ת2ץ
ת2צ
ת2ק
ת2ר
ת2ש
ת3בא
ת3בו
ת3בט
ת3במ
ת3בף
ת3בת
ת3בü
ת3ב‏
ת3בÿ
ת3גא
ת3גו
ת3גט
ת3גמ
ת3גף
ת3גת
ת3גü
ת3ג‏
ת3גÿ
ת3דא
ת3דו
ת3דט
ת3דמ
ת3דף
ת3דת
ת3דü
ת3ד‏
ת3דÿ
ת3הא
ת3הו
ת3הזא
ת3הזו
ת3הזט
ת3הזמ
ת3הזף
ת3הזת
ת3הזü
ת3הז‏
ת3הזÿ
ת3החא
ת3החו
ת3החט
ת3החמ
ת3החף
ת3החת
ת3החü
ת3הח‏
ת3החÿ
ת3הט
ת3המ
ת3הף
ת3הת
ת3הü
ת3ה‏
ת3הÿ
ת3זא
ת3זו
ת3זט
ת3זמ
ת3זף
ת3זת
ת3זü
ת3ז‏
ת3זÿ
ת3חא
ת3חו
ת3חט
ת3חמ
ת3חף
ת3חת
ת3חü
ת3ח‏
ת3חÿ
ת3יא
ת3יו
ת3יט
ת3ימ
ת3יף
ת3ית
ת3יü
ת3י‏
ת3יÿ
ת3ךא
ת3ךו
ת3ךט
ת3ךמ
ת3ךף
ת3ךת
ת3ךü
ת3ך‏
ת3ךÿ
ת3כא
ת3כו
ת3כט
ת3כמ
ת3כף
ת3כת
ת3כü
ת3כ‏
ת3כÿ
ת3לא
ת3לו
ת3לט
ת3למ
ת3לף
ת3לת
ת3לü
ת3ל‏
ת3לÿ
ת3םא
ת3םו
ת3םט
ת3םמ
ת3םף
ת3םת
ת3םü
ת3ם‏
ת3םÿ
ת3ןא
ת3ןו
ת3ןט
ת3ןמ
ת3ןף
ת3ןת
ת3ןü
ת3ן‏
ת3ןÿ
ת3נא
ת3נו
ת3נט
ת3נמ
ת3נף
ת3נת
ת3נü
ת3נ‏
ת3נÿ
ת3סא
ת3סו
ת3סט
ת3סמ
ת3סף
ת3סת
ת3סü
ת3ס‏
ת3סÿ
ת3עא
ת3עו
ת3עט
ת3עמ
ת3עף
ת3עת
ת3עü
ת3ע‏
ת3עÿ
ת3פא
ת3פו
ת3פט
ת3פמ
ת3פף
ת3פת
ת3פü
ת3פ‏
ת3פÿ
ת3ץא
ת3ץו
ת3ץט
ת3ץמ
ת3ץף
ת3ץת
ת3ץü
ת3ץ‏
ת3ץÿ
ת3צא
ת3צו
ת3צט
ת3צמ
ת3צף
ת3צת
ת3צü
ת3צ‏
ת3צÿ
ת3קא
ת3קו
ת3קט
ת3קמ
ת3קף
ת3קת
ת3קü
ת3ק‏
ת3קÿ
ת3רא
ת3רו
ת3רט
ת3רמ
ת3רף
ת3רת
ת3רü
ת3ר‏
ת3רÿ
ת3שא
ת3שו
ת3שט
ת3שמ
ת3שף
ת3שת
ת3שü
ת3ש‏
ת3שÿ
תאא4
תאו4
תאט4
תאמ4
תאף4
תאת4
תא‏4
תאÿ4
תוא4
תוו4
תוט4
תומ4
תוף4
תות4
תו‏4
תוÿ4
תטא4
תטו4
תטט4
תטמ4
תטף4
תטת4
תט‏4
תטÿ4
תמא4
תמו4
תמט4
תממ4
תמף4
תמת4
תמ‏4
תמÿ4
תףא4
תףו4
תףט4
תףמ4
תףף4
תףת4
תף‏4
תףÿ4
תתא4
תתו4
תתט4
תתמ4
תתף4
תתת4
תת‏4
תתÿ4
ת‏א4
ת‏ו4
ת‏ט4
ת‏מ4
ת‏ף4
ת‏ת4
ת‏‏4
ת‏ÿ4
תÿא4
תÿו4
תÿט4
תÿמ4
תÿף4
תÿת4
תÿ‏4
תÿÿ4
‏1
‏2ב
‏2ג
‏2ד
‏2ה
‏2ז
‏2ח
‏2י
‏2ך
‏2כ
‏2ל
‏2ם
‏2ן
‏2נ
‏2ס
‏2ע
‏2פ
‏2ץ
‏2צ
‏2ק
‏2ר
‏2ש
‏3בא
‏3בו
‏3בט
‏3במ
‏3בף
‏3בת
‏3בü
‏3ב‏
‏3בÿ
‏3גא
‏3גו
‏3גט
‏3גמ
‏3גף
‏3גת
‏3גü
‏3ג‏
‏3גÿ
‏3דא
‏3דו
‏3דט
‏3דמ
‏3דף
‏3דת
‏3דü
‏3ד‏
‏3דÿ
‏3הא
‏3הו
‏3הזא
‏3הזו
‏3הזט
‏3הזמ
‏3הזף
‏3הזת
‏3הזü
‏3הז‏
‏3הזÿ
‏3החא
‏3החו
‏3החט
‏3החמ
‏3החף
‏3החת
‏3החü
‏3הח‏
‏3החÿ
‏3הט
‏3המ
‏3הף
‏3הת
‏3הü
‏3ה‏
‏3הÿ
‏3זא
‏3זו
‏3זט
‏3זמ
‏3זף
‏3זת
‏3זü
‏3ז‏
‏3זÿ
‏3חא
‏3חו
‏3חט
‏3חמ
‏3חף
‏3חת
‏3חü
‏3ח‏
‏3חÿ
‏3יא
‏3יו
‏3יט
‏3ימ
‏3יף
‏3ית
‏3יü
‏3י‏
‏3יÿ
‏3ךא
‏3ךו
‏3ךט
‏3ךמ
‏3ךף
‏3ךת
‏3ךü
‏3ך‏
‏3ךÿ
‏3כא
‏3כו
‏3כט
‏3כמ
‏3כף
‏3כת
‏3כü
‏3כ‏
‏3כÿ
‏3לא
‏3לו
‏3לט
‏3למ
‏3לף
‏3לת
‏3לü
‏3ל‏
‏3לÿ
‏3םא
‏3םו
‏3םט
‏3םמ
‏3םף
‏3םת
‏3םü
‏3ם‏
‏3םÿ
‏3ןא
‏3ןו
‏3ןט
‏3ןמ
‏3ןף
‏3ןת
‏3ןü
‏3ן‏
‏3ןÿ
‏3נא
‏3נו
‏3נט
‏3נמ
‏3נף
‏3נת
‏3נü
‏3נ‏
‏3נÿ
‏3סא
‏3סו
‏3סט
‏3סמ
‏3סף
‏3סת
‏3סü
‏3ס‏
‏3סÿ
‏3עא
‏3עו
‏3עט
‏3עמ
‏3עף
‏3עת
‏3עü
‏3ע‏
‏3עÿ
‏3פא
‏3פו
‏3פט
‏3פמ
‏3פף
‏3פת
‏3פü
‏3פ‏
‏3פÿ
‏3ץא
‏3ץו
‏3ץט
‏3ץמ
‏3ץף
‏3ץת
‏3ץü
‏3ץ‏
‏3ץÿ
‏3צא
‏3צו
‏3צט
‏3צמ
‏3צף
‏3צת
‏3צü
‏3צ‏
‏3צÿ
‏3קא
‏3קו
‏3קט
‏3קמ
‏3קף
‏3קת
‏3קü
‏3ק‏
‏3קÿ
‏3רא
‏3רו
‏3רט
‏3רמ
‏3רף
‏3רת
‏3רü
‏3ר‏
‏3רÿ
‏3שא
‏3שו
‏3שט
‏3שמ
‏3שף
‏3שת
‏3שü
‏3ש‏
‏3שÿ
‏אא4
‏או4
‏אט4
‏אמ4
‏אף4
‏את4
‏א‏4
‏אÿ4
‏וא4
‏וו4
‏וט4
‏ומ4
‏וף4
‏ות4
‏ו‏4
‏וÿ4
‏טא4
‏טו4
‏טט4
‏טמ4
‏טף4
‏טת4
‏ט‏4
‏טÿ4
‏מא4
‏מו4
‏מט4
‏ממ4
‏מף4
‏מת4
‏מ‏4
‏מÿ4
‏ףא4
‏ףו4
‏ףט4
‏ףמ4
‏ףף4
‏ףת4
‏ף‏4
‏ףÿ4
‏תא4
‏תו4
‏תט4
‏תמ4
‏תף4
‏תת4
‏ת‏4
‏תÿ4
‏‏א4
‏‏ו4
‏‏ט4
‏‏מ4
‏‏ף4
‏‏ת4
‏‏‏4
‏‏ÿ4
‏ÿא4
‏ÿו4
‏ÿט4
‏ÿמ4
‏ÿף4
‏ÿת4
‏ÿ‏4
‏ÿÿ4
ÿ1
ÿ2ב
ÿ2ג
ÿ2ד
ÿ2ה
ÿ2ז
ÿ2ח
ÿ2י
ÿ2ך
ÿ2כ
ÿ2ל
ÿ2ם
ÿ2ן
ÿ2נ
ÿ2ס
ÿ2ע
ÿ2פ
ÿ2ץ
ÿ2צ
ÿ2ק
ÿ2ר
ÿ2ש
ÿ3בא
ÿ3בו
ÿ3בט
ÿ3במ
ÿ3בף
ÿ3בת
ÿ3בü
ÿ3ב‏
ÿ3בÿ
ÿ3גא
ÿ3גו
ÿ3גט
ÿ3גמ
ÿ3גף
ÿ3גת
ÿ3גü
ÿ3ג‏
ÿ3גÿ
ÿ3דא
ÿ3דו
ÿ3דט
ÿ3דמ
ÿ3דף
ÿ3דת
ÿ3דü
ÿ3ד‏
ÿ3דÿ
ÿ3הא
ÿ3הו
ÿ3הזא
ÿ3הזו
ÿ3הזט
ÿ3הזמ
ÿ3הזף
ÿ3הזת
ÿ3הזü
ÿ3הז‏
ÿ3הזÿ
ÿ3החא
ÿ3החו
ÿ3החט
ÿ3החמ
ÿ3החף
ÿ3החת
ÿ3החü
ÿ3הח‏
ÿ3החÿ
ÿ3הט
ÿ3המ
ÿ3הף
ÿ3הת
ÿ3הü
ÿ3ה‏
ÿ3הÿ
ÿ3זא
ÿ3זו
ÿ3זט
ÿ3זמ
ÿ3זף
ÿ3זת
ÿ3זü
ÿ3ז‏
ÿ3זÿ
ÿ3חא
ÿ3חו
ÿ3חט
ÿ3חמ
ÿ3חף
ÿ3חת
ÿ3חü
ÿ3ח‏
ÿ3חÿ
ÿ3יא
ÿ3יו
ÿ3יט
ÿ3ימ
ÿ3יף
ÿ3ית
ÿ3יü
ÿ3י‏
ÿ3יÿ
ÿ3ךא
ÿ3ךו
ÿ3ךט
ÿ3ךמ
ÿ3ךף
ÿ3ךת
ÿ3ךü
ÿ3ך‏
ÿ3ךÿ
ÿ3כא
ÿ3כו
ÿ3כט
ÿ3כמ
ÿ3כף
ÿ3כת
ÿ3כü
ÿ3כ‏
ÿ3כÿ
ÿ3לא
ÿ3לו
ÿ3לט
ÿ3למ
ÿ3לף
ÿ3לת
ÿ3לü
ÿ3ל‏
ÿ3לÿ
ÿ3םא
ÿ3םו
ÿ3םט
ÿ3םמ
ÿ3םף
ÿ3םת
ÿ3םü
ÿ3ם‏
ÿ3םÿ
ÿ3ןא
ÿ3ןו
ÿ3ןט
ÿ3ןמ
ÿ3ןף
ÿ3ןת
ÿ3ןü
ÿ3ן‏
ÿ3ןÿ
ÿ3נא
ÿ3נו
ÿ3נט
ÿ3נמ
ÿ3נף
ÿ3נת
ÿ3נü
ÿ3נ‏
ÿ3נÿ
ÿ3סא
ÿ3סו
ÿ3סט
ÿ3סמ
ÿ3סף
ÿ3סת
ÿ3סü
ÿ3ס‏
ÿ3סÿ
ÿ3עא
ÿ3עו
ÿ3עט
ÿ3עמ
ÿ3עף
ÿ3עת
ÿ3עü
ÿ3ע‏
ÿ3עÿ
ÿ3פא
ÿ3פו
ÿ3פט
ÿ3פמ
ÿ3פף
ÿ3פת
ÿ3פü
ÿ3פ‏
ÿ3פÿ
ÿ3ץא
ÿ3ץו
ÿ3ץט
ÿ3ץמ
ÿ3ץף
ÿ3ץת
ÿ3ץü
ÿ3ץ‏
ÿ3ץÿ
ÿ3צא
ÿ3צו
ÿ3צט
ÿ3צמ
ÿ3צף
ÿ3צת
ÿ3צü
ÿ3צ‏
ÿ3צÿ
ÿ3קא
ÿ3קו
ÿ3קט
ÿ3קמ
ÿ3קף
ÿ3קת
ÿ3קü
ÿ3ק‏
ÿ3קÿ
ÿ3רא
ÿ3רו
ÿ3רט
ÿ3רמ
ÿ3רף
ÿ3רת
ÿ3רü
ÿ3ר‏
ÿ3רÿ
ÿ3שא
ÿ3שו
ÿ3שט
ÿ3שמ
ÿ3שף
ÿ3שת
ÿ3שü
ÿ3ש‏
ÿ3שÿ
ÿאא4
ÿאו4
ÿאט4
ÿאמ4
ÿאף4
ÿאת4
ÿא‏4
ÿאÿ4
ÿוא4
ÿוו4
ÿוט4
ÿומ4
ÿוף4
ÿות4
ÿו‏4
ÿוÿ4
ÿטא4
ÿטו4
ÿטט4
ÿטמ4
ÿטף4
ÿטת4
ÿט‏4
ÿטÿ4
ÿמא4
ÿמו4
ÿמט4
ÿממ4
ÿמף4
ÿמת4
ÿמ‏4
ÿמÿ4
ÿףא4
ÿףו4
ÿףט4
ÿףמ4
ÿףף4
ÿףת4
ÿף‏4
ÿףÿ4
ÿתא4
ÿתו4
ÿתט4
ÿתמ4
ÿתף4
ÿתת4
ÿת‏4
ÿתÿ4
ÿ‏א4
ÿ‏ו4
ÿ‏ט4
ÿ‏מ4
ÿ‏ף4
ÿ‏ת4
ÿ‏‏4
ÿ‏ÿ4
ÿÿא4
ÿÿו4
ÿÿט4
ÿÿמ4
ÿÿף4
ÿÿת4
ÿÿ‏4
ÿÿÿ4
